Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201575-337
Owner of personal vehicle; duty.

The owner of any personal vehicle used in connection with a transportation network company shall have the duty to maintain collision physical damage coverage and comprehensive physical damage coverage for transportation network company activity if the vehicle is required to carry such coverage due to a contractual obligation.

Laws 2015, LB629, § 16.
May 28, 2015